Hawaii, session 2025, HB691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the enforcement of campaign finance regulations is essential to preserving the public trust.  In recent years, numerous policy proposals to strengthen campaign spending laws have been put forward, including legislation recommended by the commission to improve standards of conduct in 2022, such as proposals to increase public financing in local elections and other ideas aimed at enhancing the islands' electoral system. The legislature additionally finds that the campaign spending commission is tasked with enforcing campaign finance laws and managing the State's campaign spending programs.  Despite the establishment of numerous new campaign finance regulations in the decades after its inception, the commission has not received additional personnel. The legislature further finds that it is in the public's interest to ensure that the campaign spending commission has the staffing necessary to effectively enforce campaign finance laws and implement upgrades to Hawaii's campaign spending programs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for additional staffing for the campaign spending commission. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE) permanent positions within the campaign spending commission. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________